Alabama, session 2026rs, HB345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Those general and permanent laws of the
state enacted during the 2025 Regular Session as contained in
the 2025 Cumulative Supplements to Volumes 3 to 22A,
Page 2

the 2025 Cumulative Supplements to Volumes 3 to 22A,
HB345 INTRODUCED
inclusive, and the additions and deletions made by the Code
Commissioner for editorial purposes, as edited and published
by Thomson Reuters, as the Code Publisher, which volumes of
the 2025 Cumulative Supplements are identified and
authenticated by the Great Seal of the State of Alabama placed
upon the front and back of each of the volumes of the
cumulative supplements and upon the first inside page and the
last inside page of the replacement volumes, are adopted and
incorporated into the Code of Alabama 1975.
(b) The following corrections are made:
(1) Section 11-40-62, 2025 Cumulative Supplement to
Volume 8, page 109. To revise an internal citation to reflect
the relettering of hierarchical units within Section 40-10-132
by Act 2024-83, in paragraph (9)b., replace "Section
40-10-132(a)(2)" with "Section 40-10-132(b)(2)"
(2) "Section 13A-12-3.5, Volume 12A, page 629. To
conform the age prohibition referenced in subdivision (1) to
amendments made by Act 2021-453, replace the language "19
Years of Age" with "21 Years of Age"
(3) Section 13A-12-3.8, 2025 Cumulative Supplement to
Volume 12A, page 173. To correct a typographical error and
reference to apparently intended code section, in subsection
(a), replace "Section 28-11-4" with "Section 28-11-7"
(4) Section 17-3-2, 2025 Cumulative Supplement to
Volume 13B, page 3. To correct a publishing error, in the
second sentence of subdivision (a)(1), replace the language
"the that county" with "the county"
(5) Section 39-2-2, 2025 Cumulative Supplement to
Page 3

(5) Section 39-2-2, 2025 Cumulative Supplement to
HB345 INTRODUCED
Volume 20, page 181. To correct a clerical error and reference
the apparently intended agency, in subdivision (b)(3), replace
the language "the Department of Finance may" with "the
Department of Transportation may"
(6) Section 45-16A-40.07, 2025 Cumulative Supplement to
Volume 22D, page 147. To correct a grammatical error, at the
end of the first sentence, replace ". If" with ", and if"
Section 2. Those local and permanent laws of the state
pertaining to various counties enacted during the 2025 Regular
Session, as contained in the 2025 Cumulative Supplements to
Volumes 22B, 22C, 22D, 22E, 22F, 22G, 22H, 22I, 22J, 22K, 22L,
22M, and 22N and the 2025 Regular Session additions and
deletions made by the Code Commissioner for editorial
purposes, as edited and published by Thomson Reuters, as the
Code Publisher, which volumes of the 2025 Cumulative
100 Supplements are identified and authenticated by the Great Seal
101 of the State of Alabama placed upon the front and back of each
102 of the volumes of the cumulative supplements, are adopted and
103 incorporated into the Code of Alabama 1975.
104 Section 3. The adoption and incorporation of the
105 supplements specified in this act shall constitute a
106 continuous systematic codification of the entire Code of
107 Alabama 1975, for purposes of Section 85 of the Constitution
108 of Alabama of 2022. This act is a law that adopts a code for
109 the purposes of Section 45 of the Constitution of Alabama of
110 2022. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this act shall
111 be deemed to codify any provision of law that was adopted in
112 violation of any provision of the Constitution of Alabama of
Page 4

violation of any provision of the Constitution of Alabama of
HB345 INTRODUCED
113 2022, establishing requirements for, or limitations on, the
114 enactment of a law.
115 Section 4. The adoption of this act shall not repeal,
116 supersede, amend, or in any other way affect any statute
117 enacted into law during any 2026 session of the Legislature.
118 Section 5. Upon passage and approval of this act, the
119 duly authenticated volumes of the 2025 Cumulative Supplements
120 shall be transmitted to the Secretary of State, who shall file
121 the volumes of the supplements and the replacement volumes in
122 that office. The volumes of the supplements and replacement
123 volumes shall not be removed from the office of the Secretary
124 of State, but the Secretary of State, upon request, under
125 proper certificate and seal of that office, shall certify any
126 part or parts thereof upon payment of the fee specified by law
127 for similar services.
128 Section 6. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 5